West Virginia, session 2025, SB542.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. HOSPITALS AND SIMILAR INSTITUTIONS. §16B-3-11a. Violations; penalties. Any person, partnership, association, or corporation establishing, conducting, managing, or operating a standalone methadone treatment program or clinic, that is not a part of a comprehensive primary care clinic, is guilty of a felony, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished for the first offense by a fine of not more than $1000, or by imprisonment in a state correctional facility for not less than one year, or both fined and imprisoned. Each day of a continuing violation after conviction shall be considered a separate offense.